Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE J. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 727. MODIFICATION OF, TAMPERING WITH, AND EQUIPMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES

Sec. 727.001. MINIMUM ROAD CLEARANCE OF CERTAIN VEHICLES; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person operates on a public roadway a passenger or commercial vehicle that has been modified from its original design or weighted so that the clearance between any part of the vehicle other than the wheels and the surface of the level roadway is less than the clearance between the roadway and the lowest part of the rim of any wheel in contact with the roadway.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $50.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 727.002. TAMPERING WITH ODOMETER; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person, with intent to defraud, disconnects or resets an odometer to reduce the number of miles indicated on the odometer.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), an offense under this section is punishable by:

(1) confinement in the county jail for not more than two years;

(2) a fine not to exceed $1,000; or

(3) both the confinement and fine.

(c) If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the person has previously been convicted of an offense under this section, the offense is punishable by:

(1) confinement in the county jail for not less than 30 days or more than two years; and

(2) a fine not to exceed $2,000.

(d) In this section, "odometer" means an instrument for measuring and recording the distance a motor vehicle travels while in operation but does not include an auxiliary odometer designed to be reset by the operator to record mileage on trips.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 727.003. TIRE EQUIPMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLE, TRAILER, OR TRACTOR; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person operates or permits to be operated on a public highway a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or tractor equipped with:

(1) solid rubber tires less than one inch in thickness at any point from the surface to the rim; or

(2) pneumatic tires, one or more of which has been removed.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 727.004. RIM OR TIRE WIDTH; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person sells or offers for sale a road vehicle, including a wagon, that has a rim or tire width less than:

(1) three inches, if the vehicle has an intended carrying capacity of more than 2,000 pounds and not more than 4,500 pounds; or

(2) four inches, if the vehicle has an intended carrying capacity of more than 4,500 pounds.

(b) This section does not apply to an individual who sells or offers for sale a road vehicle purchased for the individual's use.

(c) An offense under this section is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 or more than $1,000.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.